Mississippi, session 2026, HB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Holmes County Heritage and Cultural Foundation, Inc., to assist in paying costs associated with the construction of the Hazel Brannon Smith Memorial Park in Lexington for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027...... $250,000.00 SECTION 2.  The Hazel Brannon Smith Memorial Park will be an outside museum park with displays and exhibitions, and is to honor Hazel Brannon Smith, a Holmes County journalist and publisher who, in 1964, became the first woman to receive the Pulitzer Prize for Editorial Writing. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.